Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.020

Plans and specifications—Estimates—Publication—Emergencies.

Whenever the state or any municipality shall determine that any public work is necessary to be done, it shall cause plans, specifications, or both thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to be made and filed in the office of the director, supervisor, commissioner, trustee, board, or agency having by law the authority to require such work to be done. The plans, specifications, and estimates of cost shall be approved by the director, supervisor, commissioner, trustee, board, or agency and the original draft or a certified copy filed in such office before further action is taken.

If the state or such municipality shall determine that it is necessary or advisable that such work shall be executed by any means or method other than by contract or by a small works roster process, and it shall appear by such estimate that the probable cost of executing such work will exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, then the state or such municipality shall at least fifteen days before beginning work cause such estimate, together with a description of the work, to be published at least once in a legal newspaper of general circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done. When any emergency shall require the immediate execution of such public work, upon a finding of the existence of such emergency by the authority having power to direct such public work to be done and duly entered of record, publication of description and estimate may be made within seven days after the commencement of the work.

[ 1994 c 243 s 1; 1993 c 379 s 111; 1986 c 282 s 2; 1982 c 98 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 230 s 2; 1967 c 70 s 1; 1923 c 183 s 2; RRS s 10322-2. Formerly RCW 39.04.020 and 39.04.030.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 379: See notes following RCW 28B.10.029.